California, session 20252026, AB439.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 30514 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30514. (a) A certified local coastal program and all local implementing ordinances, regulations, and other actions may be amended by the appropriate local government, but no such amendment shall take effect until it has been certified by the commission.(b) Any proposed amendments to a certified local coastal program shall be submitted to, and processed by, the commission in accordance with the applicable procedures and time limits specified in Sections 30512 and 30513, except that the commission shall make no determination as to whether a proposed amendment raises a substantial issue as to conformity with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200) as would otherwise be required by Section 30512. In no event shall there be more than three of these submittals of proposed amendments in any calendar year. However, there are no limitations on the number of amendments included in each of the three submittals.(c) The commission, by regulation, shall establish a procedure whereby proposed amendments to a certified local coastal program may be reviewed and designated by the executive director of the commission as being minor in nature or as requiring rapid and expeditious action. That procedure shall include provisions authorizing local governments to propose amendments to the executive director for that review and designation. Proposed amendments that are designated as being minor in nature or as requiring rapid and expeditious action shall not be subject to subdivision (b) or Sections 30512 and 30513 and shall take effect on the 10th working day after designation. Amendments that allow changes in uses shall not be so designated.(d) (1) The executive director may determine that a proposed local coastal program amendment is de minimis if the executive director determines that a proposed amendment would have no impact, either individually or cumulatively, on coastal resources, is consistent with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200), and meets the following criteria:(A) The local government, at least 21 days prior to the date of submitting the proposed amendment to the executive director, has provided public notice, and provided a copy to the commission, that specifies the dates and places where comments will be accepted on the proposed amendment, contains a brief description of the proposed amendment, and states the address where copies of the proposed amendment are available for public review, by one of the following procedures:(i) Publication, not fewer times than required by Section 6061 of the Government Code, in a newspaper of general circulation in the area affected by the proposed amendment. If more than one area will be affected, the notice shall be published in the newspaper of largest circulation from among the newspapers of general circulation in those areas.(ii) Posting of the notice by the local government both onsite and offsite in the area affected by the proposed amendment.(iii) Direct mailing to the owners and occupants of contiguous property shown on the latest equalized assessment roll.(B) The proposed amendment does not propose any change in land use or water uses or any change in the allowable use of property.(2) At the time that the local government submits the proposed amendment to the executive director, the local government shall also submit to the executive director any public comments that were received during the comment period provided pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).(3) (A) The executive director shall make a determination as to whether the proposed amendment is de minimis within 10 working days of the date of submittal by the local government. If the proposed amendment is determined to be de minimis, the proposed amendment shall be noticed in the agenda of the next regularly scheduled meeting of the commission, in accordance with Section 11125 of the Government Code, and any public comments forwarded by the local government shall be made available to the members of the commission.(B) If three members of the commission object to the executive director’s determination that the proposed amendment is de minimis, the proposed amendment shall be set for public hearing in accordance with the procedures specified in subdivision (b), or as specified in subdivision (c) if applicable, as determined by the executive director, or, at the request of the local government, returned to the local government. If set for public hearing under subdivision (b), the time requirements set by Sections 30512 and 30513 shall commence from the date on which the objection to the de minimis designation was made.(C) If three or more members of the commission do not object to the de minimis determination, the de minimis local coastal program amendment shall become part of the certified local coastal program upon adjournment of the commission meeting on that date.(4) The commission, after a noticed public hearing, may adopt guidelines to implement this subdivision, which shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law and from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The commission shall file any guidelines adopted pursuant to this paragraph with the Office of Administrative Law.(e) For purposes of this section, “amendment of a certified local coastal program” includes, but is not limited to, any action by a local government that authorizes the use of a parcel of land other than a use that is designated in the certified local coastal program as a permitted use of the parcel.SEC. 2. Section 30716 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30716. (a) A certified port master plan may be amended by the port governing body, but an amendment shall not take effect until it has been certified by the commission. Any proposed amendment shall be submitted to, and processed by, the commission in the same manner as provided for submission and certification of a port master plan.(b) The commission shall, by regulation, establish a procedure whereby proposed amendments to a certified port master plan may be reviewed and designated by the executive director of the commission as being minor in nature and need not comply with Section 30714. These amendments shall take effect on the 10th working day after the executive director designates the amendments as minor.(c) (1) The executive director may determine that a proposed certified port master plan amendment is de minimis if the executive director determines that the proposed amendment would have no impact, either individually or cumulatively, on coastal resources, is consistent with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200), and meets the following criteria:(A) The port governing body, at least 21 days prior to the date of submitting the proposed amendment to the executive director, has provided public notice, and provided a copy to the commission, which specifies the dates and places where comments will be accepted on the proposed amendment, contains a brief description of the proposed amendment, and states the address where copies of the proposed amendment are available for public review, by one of the following procedures:(i) Publication, not fewer times than required by Section 6061 of the Government Code, in a newspaper of general circulation in the area affected by the proposed amendment. If more than one area will be affected, the notice shall be published in the newspaper of largest circulation from among the newspapers of general circulation in those areas.(ii) Posting of the notice by the port governing body both onsite and offsite in the area affected by the proposed amendment.(iii) Direct mailing to the owners and occupants of contiguous property shown on the latest equalized assessment roll.(B) The proposed amendment does not propose any change in land use or water uses or any change in the allowable use of property.(2) At the time that the port governing body submits the proposed amendment to the executive director, the port governing body shall also submit to the executive director any public comments that were received during the comment period provided pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).(3) (A) The executive director shall make a determination as to whether the proposed amendment is de minimis within 10 working days from the date of submittal by the local government. If the proposed amendment is determined to be de minimis, the proposed amendment shall be noticed in the agenda of the next regularly scheduled meeting of the commission, in accordance with Section 11125 of the Government Code, and any public comments forwarded by the port governing body shall be made available to the members of the commission.(B) If three members of the commission object to the executive director’s determination that the proposed amendment is de minimis, the proposed amendment shall be set for public hearing in accordance with the procedures specified in subdivision (a) or, at the request of the port governing body, returned to the port governing body. If set for public hearing under subdivision (a), the time requirements set by this section and Section 30714 shall commence from the date on which the objection to the de minimis designation was made.(C) If three or more members of the commission do not object to the de minimis determination, the de minimis amendment shall become a part of the certified port master plan upon adjournment of the commission meeting on that date.(4) The commission may, after a noticed public hearing, adopt guidelines to implement this subdivision, which shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law and from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The commission shall file any guidelines adopted pursuant to this paragraph with the Office of Administrative Law.SEC. 3. Section 30821 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30821. (a) In addition to any other penalties imposed pursuant to this division, a person, including a landowner, who is in violation of the public access provisions of this division is subject to an administrative civil penalty that may be imposed by the commission in an amount not to exceed 75 percent of the amount of the maximum penalty authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30820 for each violation. The administrative civil penalty may be assessed for each day the violation persists, but for no more than five years.(b) All penalties imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be imposed by majority vote of the commissioners present in a duly noticed public hearing in compliance with the requirements of Section 30810, 30811, or 30812.(c) In determining the amount of civil liability, the commission shall take into account the factors set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 30820.(d) A person shall not be subject to both monetary civil liability imposed under this section and monetary civil liability imposed by the superior court for the same act or failure to act. If a person who is assessed a penalty under this section fails to pay the administrative penalty, otherwise fails to comply with a restoration or cease and desist order issued by the commission in connection with the penalty action, or challenges any of these actions by the commission in a court of law, the commission may maintain an action or otherwise engage in judicial proceedings to enforce those requirements and the court may grant any relief as provided under this chapter.(e) If a person fails to pay a penalty imposed by the commission pursuant to this section, the commission may record a lien on the property in the amount of the penalty assessed by the commission. This lien shall have the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien.(f) In enacting this section, it is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that unintentional, minor violations of this division that only cause de minimis harm will not lead to the imposition of administrative penalties if the violator has acted expeditiously to correct the violation.(g) “Person,” for the purpose of this section, does not include a local government, a special district, or an agency thereof, when acting in a legislative or adjudicative capacity.(h) Administrative penalties pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be assessed if the property owner corrects the violation consistent with this division within 30 days of receiving written notification from the commission regarding the violation, and if the alleged violator can correct the violation without undertaking additional development that requires a permit under this division. This 30-day timeframe for corrective action does not apply to previous violations of permit conditions incurred by a property owner.(i) Revenues derived pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Violation Remediation Account of the Coastal Conservancy Fund and expended pursuant to Section 30823.SEC. 4. Section 30821.3 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30821.3. (a) In addition to any other penalties imposed pursuant to this division, a person, including a landowner, who is in violation of any provision of this division other than public access, including, but not limited to, damage to archaeological and wetlands resources and damage to environmentally sensitive habitat areas, is subject to an administrative civil penalty that may be imposed by the commission in an amount not to exceed 75 percent of the amount of the maximum penalty authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30820 for each violation. The administrative civil penalty may be assessed for each day the violation persists, but for no more than five years.(b) All penalties imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be imposed by majority vote of the commissioners present in a duly noticed public hearing in compliance with the requirements of Section 30810, 30811, or 30812.(c) In determining the amount of civil liability, the commission shall take into account the factors set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 30820.(d) A person shall not be subject to both monetary civil liability imposed under this section and monetary civil liability imposed by the superior court for the same act or failure to act. If a person who is assessed a penalty under this section fails to pay the administrative penalty, otherwise fails to comply with a restoration or cease and desist order issued by the commission in connection with the penalty action, or challenges any of these actions by the commission in a court of law, the commission may maintain an action or otherwise engage in judicial proceedings to enforce those requirements and the court may grant any relief as provided under this chapter.(e) If a person fails to pay a penalty imposed by the commission pursuant to this section, the commission may record a lien on the property in the amount of the penalty assessed by the commission. This lien shall have the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien.(f) In enacting this section, it is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that unintentional, minor violations of this division that only cause de minimis harm will not lead to the imposition of administrative penalties if the violator has acted expeditiously to correct the violation.(g) “Person,” for the purpose of this section, does not include a state agency, or a local government, a special district, or an agency thereof, when acting in a legislative or adjudicative capacity.(h) Administrative penalties pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be assessed if the property owner corrects the violation consistent with this division within 60 days of receiving written notification from the commission regarding the violation, and if the alleged violator can correct the violation without undertaking additional development that requires a permit under this division. This 60-day timeframe for corrective action does not apply to previous violations of permit conditions incurred by a property owner.(i) The commission staff shall prepare and present a written report to the full commission at its first public hearing after January 1, 2024, and, notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, every five years thereafter at the first hearing of the year, that includes all of the following related to the implementation of this section and Section 30821:(1) The number and type of new violations investigated and identified that were reported during the previous five years.(2) The number of violations resolved during the previous five years, including a description of those resolved without the imposition of an administrative civil penalty.(3) The number of administrative penalties issued pursuant to this section and Section 30821 during the previous five years, the dollar amount of the penalties, and a description of the violations that resulted in the imposition of a penalty.(4) The number of violations that were referred by the commission to the Attorney General during the previous five years.(5) The number of violations that were pending at the end of the reporting period.(6) Summaries of violations that were resolved that are both illustrative of the commission’s enforcement workload and that provided significant public benefit.(j) The commission staff shall provide the written report described in subdivision (i) to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.(k) Revenues derived pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Violation Remediation Account of the Coastal Conservancy Fund and expended pursuant to Section 30823.(l) The commission shall provide an opportunity for a local government with a certified local coastal program to enforce violations of its building codes in compliance with that local coastal program.(m) Judicial review of actions taken by the commission pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 30800).